Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.170

Personal liability of receiver.

(1)(a) The receiver is personally liable to the person over whose property the receiver is appointed or its record or beneficial owners, or to the estate, for loss or diminution in value of or damage to estate property, only if (i) the loss or damage is caused by a failure on the part of the receiver to comply with an order of the court, or (ii) the loss or damage is caused by an act or omission for which members of a board of directors of a business corporation organized and existing under the laws of this state who vote to approve the act or omission are liable to the corporation in cases in which the liability of directors is limited to the maximum extent permitted by RCW 23B.08.320.

(b) A general receiver is personally liable to state agencies for failure to remit sales tax collected after appointment. A custodial receiver is personally liable to state agencies for failure to remit sales tax collected after appointment with regard to assets administered by the receiver.

(2) The receiver has no personal liability to a person other than the person over whose property the receiver is appointed or its record or beneficial owners for any loss or damage occasioned by the receiver's performance of the duties imposed by the appointment, or out of the receiver's authorized operation of any business of a person, except loss or damage occasioned by fraud on the part of the receiver, by acts intended by the receiver to cause loss or damage to the specific claimant, or by acts or omissions for which an officer of a business corporation organized and existing under the laws of this state are liable to the claimant under the same circumstances.

(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1)(a) and (2) of this section, a receiver has no personal liability to any person for acts or omissions of the receiver specifically contemplated by any order of the court.

(4) A person other than a successor receiver duly appointed by the court does not have a right of action against a receiver under this section to recover property or the value thereof for or on behalf of the estate.

[ 2004 c 165 s 19.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.